incubator/apertium-en-sq/apertium-en-sq.sq.dix
    <pardef n="/kam__vbkam">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kam</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kemi</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>keni</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kanë</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pata</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pate</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pati</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>patëm</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>patët</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>patën</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kisha</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kishe</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kishte</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kishim</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kishit</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kishin</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pasur</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    <!-- Nouns -->

    <pardef n="anglez__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esh</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eje</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eje</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esh</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eve</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="anormal"><i>anormal</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="racionalizator"><i>racionalizator</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="racor"><i>racor</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="radist"><i>radist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rebel"><i>rebel</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="redaktor"><i>redaktor</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aktivist"><i>aktivist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="altruist"><i>altruist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anarkist"><i>anarkist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antifashist"><i>antifashist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antikapitalist"><i>antikapitalist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antimarksist"><i>antimarksist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antizogist"><i>antizogist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ballist"><i>ballist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="basketbollist"><i>basketbollist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bursist"><i>bursist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="centralist"><i>centralist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daktilografist"><i>daktilografist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dentist"><i>dentist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="djathtist"><i>djathtist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="egoist"><i>egoist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekspansionist"><i>ekspansionist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekstremist"><i>ekstremist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elektricist"><i>elektricist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="evolucionist"><i>evolucionist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="finalist"><i>finalist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="formalist"><i>formalist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fundamentalist"><i>fundamentalist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gjimnazist"><i>gjimnazist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="harpist"><i>harpist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="humanist"><i>humanist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iluminist"><i>iluminist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="impresionist"><i>impresionist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="instrumentist"><i>instrumentist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="internacionalist"><i>internacionalist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jomarksist"><i>jomarksist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jorealist"><i>jorealist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karrierist"><i>karrierist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kolonialist"><i>kolonialist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konformist"><i>konformist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kooperativist"><i>kooperativist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lokalist"><i>lokalist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maoist"><i>maoist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="materialist"><i>materialist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="militarist"><i>militarist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="modist"><i>modist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="monist"><i>monist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="moralist"><i>moralist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="natyralist"><i>natyralist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nazifashist"><i>nazifashist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nihilist"><i>nihilist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oportunist"><i>oportunist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="orientalist"><i>orientalist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="panteist"><i>panteist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paramarksist"><i>paramarksist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="parashutist"><i>parashutist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pensionist"><i>pensionist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pianist"><i>pianist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="postkomunist"><i>postkomunist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="profashist"><i>profashist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="progresist"><i>progresist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="përlist"><i>përlist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="revanshist"><i>revanshist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rezervist"><i>rezervist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sindikalist"><i>sindikalist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snobist"><i>snobist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sportist"><i>sportist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="surrealist"><i>surrealist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tezgjahist"><i>tezgjahist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="utilitarist"><i>utilitarist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kam"><i/><par n="/kam__vbkam"/></e>
